test/src/morphology/N-osi_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/aANlyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/aANlyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Noun - ôsi - ok : # -m inanimate noun
     ôsi+N+IN+Sg: ôsi
     ôsi+N+IN+Pl: ôsa
     ôsi+N+IN+Loc: ôsihk
     ôsi+N+IN+Dim+Sg: ôsisis
     ôsi+N+IN+Dim+Pl: ôsisisa

     ôsi+N+IN+Sg+Px1Sg: nitôsi
     ôsi+N+IN+Sg+Px2Sg: kitôsi
     ôsi+N+IN+Sg+Px3Sg: otôsi
     ôsi+N+IN+Sg+Px3iSg: otôsiyiw
     ôsi+N+IN+Sg+Px1Pl: nitôsinân
     ôsi+N+IN+Sg+Px12Pl: kitôsinân
     ôsi+N+IN+Sg+Px2Pl: kiniskâw
     ôsi+N+IN+Sg+Px3Pl: oniskâw
     ôsi+N+IN+Sg+Px3iPl: otôsiyiw

     ôsi+N+IN+Pl+Px1Sg: nitôsa
     ôsi+N+IN+Pl+Px2Sg: kitôsik
     ôsi+N+IN+Pl+Px3Sg: otôsi
     ôsi+N+IN+Pl+Px3iSg: otôsiyiwa
     ôsi+N+IN+Pl+Px1Pl: nitôsinâna
     ôsi+N+IN+Pl+Px12Pl: kitôsinawa
     ôsi+N+IN+Pl+Px2Pl: kitôsiwâwa
     ôsi+N+IN+Pl+Px3Pl: otôsiwâwa
     ôsi+N+IN+Pl+Px3iPl: otôsiyiwa

     ôsi+N+IN+Dim+Sg+Px1Sg: nitôsisis
     ôsi+N+IN+Dim+Sg+Px2Sg: kitôsisis
     ôsi+N+IN+Dim+Sg+Px3Sg: otôsisis
     ôsi+N+IN+Dim+Sg+Px3iSg: otôsisisiyiw
     ôsi+N+IN+Dim+Sg+Px1Pl: nitôsisisinân
     ôsi+N+IN+Dim+Sg+Px12Pl: kitôsisisinaw
     ôsi+N+IN+Dim+Sg+Px2Pl: kitôsisisiwâw
     ôsi+N+IN+Dim+Sg+Px3Pl: otôsisisiwâw
     ôsi+N+IN+Dim+Sg+Px3iPl: otôsisisiyiw

     ôsi+N+IN+Dim+Pl+Px1Sg: nitôsisisa
     ôsi+N+IN+Dim+Pl+Px2Sg: kitôsisisa
     ôsi+N+IN+Dim+Pl+Px3Sg: otôsisisa
     ôsi+N+IN+Dim+Pl+Px3iSg: otôsisisiyiwa
     ôsi+N+IN+Dim+Pl+Px1Pl: nitôsisisinâna
     ôsi+N+IN+Dim+Pl+Px12Pl: kitôsisisinawa
     ôsi+N+IN+Dim+Pl+Px2Pl: kitôsisisiwâwa
     ôsi+N+IN+Dim+Pl+Px3Pl: otôsisisiwâwa
     ôsi+N+IN+Dim+Pl+Px3iPl	otôsisisiyiwa

     ôsi+N+IN+Px1Sg+Loc: nitôsihk
     ôsi+N+IN+Px2Sg+Loc: kitôsihk
     ôsi+N+IN+Px3Sg+Loc: otôsihk
     ôsi+N+IN+Px3iSg+Loc: otôsiyihk
     ôsi+N+IN+Px1Pl+Loc: nisinânihk
     ôsi+N+IN+Px12Pl+Loc: kitôsinâhk
     ôsi+N+IN+Px2Pl+Loc: kisiwâwihk
     ôsi+N+IN+Px3Pl+Loc: osiwâwihk 
     ôsi+N+IN+Px3iPl+Loc: otôsiyihk
     
     ôsi+N+IN+Dim+Px1Sg+Loc: nitôsisisihk
     ôsi+N+IN+Dim+Px2Sg+Loc	kitôsisisihk
     ôsi+N+IN+Dim+Px3Sg+Loc: otôsisisihk
     ôsi+N+IN+Dim+Px3iSg+Loc: otôsissiyihk
     ôsi+N+IN+Dim+Px1Pl+Loc: nitôsisisnânihk
     ôsi+N+IN+Dim+Px12Pl+Loc: kitôsissinâh
     ôsi+N+IN+Dim+Px2Pl+Loc: kitôsisiswâwihk
     ôsi+N+IN+Dim+Px3Pl+Loc: otôsisiswâwihk
     ôsi+N+IN+Dim+Px3iPl+Loc: otôsisisiyihk
